Hawaii statutes.
§431:14-116.6 Assigned risk pool;
residual market plan. (a) The commissioner shall establish a residual
market plan to provide equitable apportionment of insurance that may be
afforded to applicants who are in good faith entitled to, but who are unable to
procure, such insurance through ordinary methods. The residual market plan
shall include rules for classification of risks and rates.

(b) Any insured placed with the plan shall be
notified that insurance coverage is being afforded through the plan and not
through the private market. Written notification shall be given to the insured
within ten days of placement with the plan.

(c) To ensure that plan rates are made
adequate to pay claims and expenses, insurers shall develop a means of
obtaining loss and expense experience at least annually. Each insurer shall
submit a report on loss and expense experience, when available, with the
department in sufficient detail to make a determination of rate adequacy.

(d) The plan shall provide a formula allowing
an insurer who voluntarily removes an insured risk from the residual market to
be eligible for a take-out credit applicable against that insurer's residual
market assessment base levied by the plan. The terms and conditions of the
take-out credit shall be as follows:

(1) An insurer shall receive a credit against its
assessment base for the amount of the annual premium reflected in its financial
statements for the respective calendar year. This reported premium shall be
stated on the same financial basis as the premiums that are reported for use in
determining each insurer's residual market assessment base and shall be subject
to subsequent adjustments and audits;

(2) The credit applicable to the residual market
assessment base shall be as follows:

First year: $2 credit for every $1 of
premium removed;

Second year: $1 credit for every $1 of
premium removed; and

Third year: $1 for every $1 of premium
removed;

(3) If the insurer keeps the insured risk out of the
residual market for three years, that insurer shall receive credit for each of
three years. If the insurer does not write the business for three years, it
shall receive credit only for the period of time that it covered the risk in
the voluntary market. Under no circumstances shall an insurer receive credit
for risks returned to the residual market within one policy year;

(4) An insurer shall not return an insured taken from
the residual market to the residual market after one year of coverage to
subsequently reissue insurance to the insured to obtain the higher credit
established for the first year of residual market removal in paragraph (2);

(5) There shall be no maximum limit on credits
received; provided that the credits shall not reduce the insurer's assessment
base below zero;

(6) The kind and amount of coverage to be offered to
voluntary risks shall not be less than those afforded by the policy being
replaced, unless the kinds and amounts are refused by the insureds;

(7) The commissioner may approve loss sensitive
rating plans for larger companies that generate more than $150,000 in insurance
premiums; and

(8) The commissioner may adjust or terminate the
credit program depending on market conditions, provided that any adjustment or
termination shall not affect any credit earned prior to the adjustment or
termination.

(e) The commissioner may adopt rules in
accordance with chapter 91 to effectuate the purposes of this section.

(f) As used in this section, unless the
context otherwise requires:

"Plan" means the residual market plan.

"Residual market assessment base"
means the basis for assessing insurers for losses from the residual market, as
provided for in a residual market plan. [L 1995, c 234, pt of §20; am L 1996, c
224, §2]

Cross References

Discontinuation of residual market plan, see §431:14A-118.

Pooled insurance policies, see §431:10-222.5.

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next